Hawaii statutes.
PART II. INDUSTRIAL
HEMP PILOT PROGRAM

Note

Part repealed June 30, 2021. L 2016, c 228, §8.

[§141-31] Definitions. As used in this
part:

"Applicant" means a person that is an
individual residing in Hawaii or an institution of higher education, a sole
proprietorship, partnership, association, corporation, limited-liability
corporation, limited partnership, or any other business entity having any:

(1) Place of business permanently located within the
State;

(2) Employees permanently assigned to work stations
or areas located within the State; or

(3) Tangible assets permanently located within the
State.

"Board" means the board of
agriculture.

"Chairperson" means the chairperson
of the board of agriculture.

"Industrial hemp" means the plant
Cannabis sativa L. and any part of that plant, whether growing or not, with a
delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of not more than 0.3 per cent on a
dry weight basis or a tetrahydrocannabinol concentration allowed by federal
law, whichever is greater, that is cultivated.

"Seed cultivar" means a variety of
industrial hemp.

"Variety" means a group of individual
plants that exhibit the same observable physical characteristics or have the
same genetic composition. [L 2016, c 228, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next